Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.080

Fraudulent removal of property.

Every person who, with intent to defraud a prior or subsequent purchaser thereof, or prevent any of his or her property being made liable for the payment of any of his or her debts, or levied upon by an execution or warrant of attachment, shall remove any of his or her property, or secrete, assign, convey, or otherwise dispose of the same, or with intent to defraud a creditor shall remove, secrete, assign, convey, or otherwise dispose of any of his or her books or accounts, vouchers or writings in any way relating to his or her business affairs, or destroy, obliterate, alter, or erase any of such books of account, accounts, vouchers, or writing or any entry, memorandum, or minute therein contained, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 299; 1909 c 249 s 379; RRS s 2631.]